apertium-sme-sma.sma.lexc
LEXICON ODDCOMP
+A+Comp+Attr:%>åbpoe ATTRCONT ;
+A+Comp+Pred:%>åbpoe FINAL1 ;
+A+Comp:%>åbp ÅBPOE ;
+A+Superl+Attr:%>ommes ATTRCONT ;
+A+Superl+Pred:%>ommes FINAL1 ;
:%>ommes OMMES ;
+A+Comp+Der1+Der/Dim+Attr:%>obpe%»tje ATTRCONT ;
+A+Comp+Der1+Der/Dim+Pred:%>obpe%»tje FINAL1 ;
+A+Comp+Der1+Der/Dim:%>obpe%»tj  GÅATETJE ;
+A+Comp+Attr:%>abpa ATTRCONT ;
+A+Comp+Pred:%>abpa FINAL1 ;
+A+Comp:%>abp ABPA ;
+A+Superl+Attr:%>ammes ATTRCONT ;
+A+Superl+Pred:%>ammes FINAL1 ;
:%>ammes OMMES ;
+A+Comp+Der1+Der/Dim+Attr:%>abpe%»tje ATTRCONT ;
+A+Comp+Der1+Der/Dim+Pred:%>abpe%»tje FINAL1 ;
+A+Comp+Der1+Der/Dim:%>abpa%»tj  GÅATETJE ;

LEXICON EVENCOMPCASE
 +Sg+Nom:%>%^COMPDISIMPbe%^DISIMP         FINAL1 ;
 +Sg+Acc:%>%^COMPDISIMPbe%>%^DISIMPm      FINAL1 ;
 +Sg+Gen:%>%^COMPDISIMPbe%>%^DISIMPn      FINAL1 ;
 +Sg+Ill:b%>asse            FINAL1 ; !Rule to delete Jesuse%>asse > Jesusasse
 +Sg+Ine:b%>isnie           FINAL1 ;
 +Sg+Ela:b%>istie           FINAL1 ;
 +Sg+Com:b%>inie            FINAL1 ;
 +Pl+Nom:%>%^COMPDISIMPb%>%^DISIMPh       FINAL1 ;
 +Pl+Acc:b%>idie            FINAL1 ;
 +Pl+Gen:%>%^COMPDISIMPb%>%^DISIMPi       FINAL1 ;
 +Pl+Ill:b%>idie            FINAL1 ;
 +Pl+Ine:b%>inie            FINAL1 ;
 +Pl+Ela:b%>ijstie          FINAL1 ;
 +Pl+Com:b%>%^DISIMPigujmie FINAL1 ;
  :b  N_ODD_ESS ;
 +SgNomCmp:%>%^COMPDISIMPbe%^DISIMP            R ;
 +SgGenCmp:%>%^COMPDISIMPbe%>%^DISIMPn        R ;
 +PlGenCmp:%>%^COMPDISIMPb%>%^DISIMPi R ;

LEXICON EVENCOMPCASE_oe
 +Sg+Nom:%>%^COMPDISIMPbe%^DISIMP         FINAL1 ;
 +Sg+Acc:%>%^COMPDISIMPbe%>%^DISIMPm      FINAL1 ;
 +Sg+Gen:%>%^COMPDISIMPbe%>%^DISIMPn      FINAL1 ;
 +Sg+Ill:b%>asse            FINAL1 ; !Rule to delete Jesuse%>asse > Jesusasse
 +Sg+Ine:b%>isnie           FINAL1 ;
 +Sg+Ela:b%>istie           FINAL1 ;
 +Sg+Com:b%>inie            FINAL1 ;
 +Pl+Nom:%>%^COMPDISIMPb%>%^DISIMPh       FINAL1 ;
 +Pl+Acc:b%>idie            FINAL1 ;
 +Pl+Gen:%>%^COMPDISIMPb%>%^DISIMPi       FINAL1 ;
 +Pl+Ill:b%>idie            FINAL1 ;
 +Pl+Ine:b%>inie            FINAL1 ;
 +Pl+Ela:b%>ijstie          FINAL1 ;
 +Pl+Com:b%>%^DISIMPigujmie FINAL1 ;
  :b  N_ODD_ESS ;
 +SgNomCmp:%>%^COMPDISIMPbe%^DISIMP            R ;
 +SgGenCmp:%>%^COMPDISIMPbe%>%^DISIMPn        R ;
 +PlGenCmp:%>%^COMPDISIMPb%>%^DISIMPi R ;
 +SgNomCmp:%>%^COMPDISIMP2be%^DISIMP            R ;
 +SgGenCmp:%>%^COMPDISIMP2be%>%^DISIMPn        R ;
 +PlGenCmp:%>%^COMPDISIMP2b%>%^DISIMPi R ;


  
LEXICON DIMCOMPCASE
+A+Comp+Der1+Der/Dim+Sg+Nom:%>b%»adtje          FINAL1 ;
+A+Comp+Der1+Der/Dim+Sg+Acc:%>b%»adtje%>m       FINAL1 ;
+A+Comp+Der1+Der/Dim+Sg+Gen:%>b%»adtje%>n       FINAL1 ;
+A+Comp+Der1+Der/Dim+Sg+Ill:%>%^COMPDISIMPb%»adtje%>se      FINAL1 ;
+A+Comp+Der1+Der/Dim+Sg+Ine:%>%^COMPDISIMPb%»adtje%>sne     FINAL1 ;
+A+Comp+Der1+Der/Dim+Sg+Ela:%>%^COMPDISIMPb%»adtje%>ste     FINAL1 ;
+A+Comp+Der1+Der/Dim+Sg+Com:%>%^COMPDISIMPb%»adtj%>ine      FINAL1 ;
+A+Comp+Der1+Der/Dim+Sg+Ill:%>%^COMPDISIMP2b%»adtje%>se      FINAL1 ;
+A+Comp+Der1+Der/Dim+Sg+Ine:%>%^COMPDISIMP2b%»adtje%>sne     FINAL1 ;
+A+Comp+Der1+Der/Dim+Sg+Ela:%>%^COMPDISIMP2b%»adtje%>ste     FINAL1 ;
+A+Comp+Der1+Der/Dim+Sg+Com:%>%^COMPDISIMP2b%»adtj%>ine      FINAL1 ;
+A+Comp+Der1+Der/Dim+Pl+Nom:%>b%»adtj%>h        FINAL1 ;
+A+Comp+Der1+Der/Dim+Pl+Acc:%>%^COMPDISIMPb%»adtj%>ide      FINAL1 ;
+A+Comp+Der1+Der/Dim+Pl+Acc:%>%^COMPDISIMP2b%»adtj%>ide      FINAL1 ;
+A+Comp+Der1+Der/Dim+Pl+Gen:%>b%»adtj%>i        FINAL1 ;
+A+Comp+Der1+Der/Dim+Pl+Ill:%>%^COMPDISIMPb%»adtj%>ide      FINAL1 ;
+A+Comp+Der1+Der/Dim+Pl+Ine:%>%^COMPDISIMPb%»adtj%>ine      FINAL1 ;
+A+Comp+Der1+Der/Dim+Pl+Ela:%>%^COMPDISIMPb%»adtj%>ijste    FINAL1 ;
+A+Comp+Der1+Der/Dim+Pl+Ill:%>%^COMPDISIMP2b%»adtj%>ide      FINAL1 ;
+A+Comp+Der1+Der/Dim+Pl+Ine:%>%^COMPDISIMP2b%»adtj%>ine      FINAL1 ;
+A+Comp+Der1+Der/Dim+Pl+Ela:%>%^COMPDISIMP2b%»adtj%>ijste    FINAL1 ;
+A+Comp+Der1+Der/Dim+Pl+Com:%>b%»adtj%>igujmie  FINAL1 ;
+A+Comp+Der1+Der/Dim+Ess:%>%^COMPDISIMPb%»adtj%>ine         FINAL1 ;
+A+Comp+Der1+Der/Dim+Ess:%>%^COMPDISIMP2b%»adtj%>ine         FINAL1 ;
+A+Comp+Der1+Der/Dim+SgNomCmp:%>b%»adtje    R ;
+A+Comp+Der1+Der/Dim+SgGenCmp:%>b%»adtje%>n R ;
+A+Comp+Der1+Der/Dim+PlGenCmp:%>b%»adtj%>i  R ;
+A+Comp+Der1+Der/Dim+Sg+Nom:%>b%»odtje          FINAL1 ;
+A+Comp+Der1+Der/Dim+Sg+Acc:%>b%»odtje%>m       FINAL1 ;
+A+Comp+Der1+Der/Dim+Sg+Gen:%>b%»odtje%>n       FINAL1 ;
+A+Comp+Der1+Der/Dim+Sg+Ill:%>%^COMPDISIMPb%»odtje%>se      FINAL1 ;
+A+Comp+Der1+Der/Dim+Sg+Ine:%>%^COMPDISIMPb%»odtje%>sne     FINAL1 ;
+A+Comp+Der1+Der/Dim+Sg+Ela:%>%^COMPDISIMPb%»odtje%>ste     FINAL1 ;
+A+Comp+Der1+Der/Dim+Sg+Com:%>%^COMPDISIMPb%»odtj%>ine      FINAL1 ;
+A+Comp+Der1+Der/Dim+Sg+Ill:%>%^COMPDISIMP2b%»odtje%>se      FINAL1 ;
+A+Comp+Der1+Der/Dim+Sg+Ine:%>%^COMPDISIMP2b%»odtje%>sne     FINAL1 ;
+A+Comp+Der1+Der/Dim+Sg+Ela:%>%^COMPDISIMP2b%»odtje%>ste     FINAL1 ;
+A+Comp+Der1+Der/Dim+Sg+Com:%>%^COMPDISIMP2b%»odtj%>ine      FINAL1 ;
+A+Comp+Der1+Der/Dim+Pl+Nom:%>b%»odtj%>h        FINAL1 ;
+A+Comp+Der1+Der/Dim+Pl+Acc:%>%^COMPDISIMPb%»odtj%>ide      FINAL1 ;
+A+Comp+Der1+Der/Dim+Pl+Acc:%>%^COMPDISIMP2b%»odtj%>ide      FINAL1 ;
+A+Comp+Der1+Der/Dim+Pl+Gen:%>b%»odtj%>i        FINAL1 ;
+A+Comp+Der1+Der/Dim+Pl+Ill:%>%^COMPDISIMPb%»odtj%>ide      FINAL1 ;
+A+Comp+Der1+Der/Dim+Pl+Ine:%>%^COMPDISIMPb%»odtj%>ine      FINAL1 ;
+A+Comp+Der1+Der/Dim+Pl+Ela:%>%^COMPDISIMPb%»odtj%>ijste    FINAL1 ;
+A+Comp+Der1+Der/Dim+Pl+Ill:%>%^COMPDISIMP2b%»odtj%>ide      FINAL1 ;
+A+Comp+Der1+Der/Dim+Pl+Ine:%>%^COMPDISIMP2b%»odtj%>ine      FINAL1 ;
+A+Comp+Der1+Der/Dim+Pl+Ela:%>%^COMPDISIMP2b%»odtj%>ijste    FINAL1 ;
+A+Comp+Der1+Der/Dim+Pl+Com:%>b%»odtj%>igujmie  FINAL1 ;
+A+Comp+Der1+Der/Dim+Ess:%>%^COMPDISIMPb%»odtj%>ine         FINAL1 ;
+A+Comp+Der1+Der/Dim+Ess:%>%^COMPDISIMP2b%»odtj%>ine         FINAL1 ;
+A+Comp+Der1+Der/Dim+SgNomCmp:%>b%»odtje    R ;
+A+Comp+Der1+Der/Dim+SgGenCmp:%>b%»odtje%>n R ;
+A+Comp+Der1+Der/Dim+PlGenCmp:%>b%»odtj%>i  R ;

! doublet fix stops here so far Trond.

LEXICON ÅBPOE
 +Sg: ÅBPOE_SGILL_UML ; ! Causes Umlaut
         ÅBPOE_N_OE ;

LEXICON ÅBPOE_SGILL_UML
 +Ill+Uml:e%>%^2UMLse	FINAL1      ; ! Causes Umlaut

LEXICON ÅBPOE_N_OE
  +Sg: ÅBPOE_N_OE_SG  ;
  +Pl: ÅBPOE_N_OE_PL  ;
  : ÅBPOE_N_OE_ESS ;
  +SgNomCmp:oe    R ;
  +SgGenCmp:oe%>n R ;
  +PlGenCmp:oe%>j R ;

LEXICON ÅBPOE_N_OE_SG
  +Nom:oe          FINAL1 ;
  +Acc:oe%>m       FINAL1 ;
  +Gen:oe%>n       FINAL1 ;
  +Ill:o%>se       FINAL1 ;
  +Ine:o%>sne      FINAL1 ;
  +Ela:o%>ste      FINAL1 ;
  +Com:o%>jne      FINAL1 ;

LEXICON ÅBPOE_N_OE_PL
  +Nom:oe%>h       FINAL1 ;
  +Acc:o%>jde      FINAL1 ;
  +Gen:oe%>j       FINAL1 ;
  +Ill:o%>jde      FINAL1 ;
  +Ine:o%>jne      FINAL1 ;
  +Ela:o%>jste     FINAL1 ;
  +Com:oe%>jgujmie FINAL1 ;

LEXICON ÅBPOE_N_OE_ESS
  +Ess:o%>jne         FINAL1 ;

LEXICON ABPA
 +Sg: ABPA_SG ; ! Causes Umlaut
  +Pl: ABPA_PL  ;
  +Ess:%>ine         FINAL1 ;


LEXICON ABPA_SG
  +Nom:a          FINAL1 ;
  +Acc:a%>m       FINAL1 ;
  +Gen:a%>n       FINAL1 ;
  +Ill:e%>se      FINAL1 ;
  +Ine:e%>sne     FINAL1 ;
  +Ela:e%>ste     FINAL1 ;
  +Com:%>ine      FINAL1 ;

LEXICON ABPA_PL
  +Nom:a%>h       FINAL1 ;
  +Acc:%>ide      FINAL1 ;
  +Gen:a%>j       FINAL1 ;
  +Ill:%>ide      FINAL1 ;
  +Ine:%>ine      FINAL1 ;
  +Ela:%>ijste    FINAL1 ;
  +Com:a%>jgujmie FINAL1 ;

LEXICON Adjective
aareh:aareg ODDCOMP ; !XXX norm? (Lohkede saemien s.116)"dagkoe gogkoe dle aaregommes" 
båeries+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG:båaras ODDCOMP ; !
eensi+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG:eensig ODDCOMP ; !eensigåbpoe !
gamte+A+Comp:gemtie EVENCOMPCASE ; ! e(1)-stamme
gamte:gemtie DIMCOMPCASE ; ! e(1)-stamme
löövles+A+Comp:lïevle EVENCOMPCASE ; ! e(3)-stamme
löövles:lïevle DIMCOMPCASE ; ! e(3)-stamme
noere+A+Comp:nuerie EVENCOMPCASE ; ! e(1)-stamme
noere:nuerie DIMCOMPCASE ; ! e(1)-stamme
orre+A+Comp:urre EVENCOMPCASE ; ! e(1)-stamme eller e(2)-stamme 
orre:urre DIMCOMPCASE ; ! e(1)-stamme eller e(2)-stamme 
plaave+A+Comp:plaevie EVENCOMPCASE ; ! e(1)-stamme
plaave:plaevie DIMCOMPCASE ; ! e(1)-stamme
rööpses+A+Comp:ruepsie EVENCOMPCASE ; ! e(3)-stamme
rööpses:ruepsie DIMCOMPCASE ; ! e(3)-stamme
